Mississippi, session 2026, SB3396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Lawrence Daniels of Lowndes County, Mississippi, who was disqualified on March 28, 2002, as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of grand larceny in Jefferson Davis Circuit Court.  He was sentenced to five (5) years probation in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He violated the terms of his probation and was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections on July 8, 2004.  He was released to earned release supervision on September 21, 2007. He was discharged on May 13, 2008, due to the expiration of his sentence.  He completed all terms and conditions of his sentence.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.